Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1847.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. PFC Raymond Lee McGarvey Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Raymond Lee McGarvey was born May 7, 1946, in Berwinsdale, Jordan Township, Clearfield County.(2) Raymond graduated from Beccaria-Coalport-Irvona High School in Coalport Borough, Clearfield County.(3) Outside of school, Raymond was active in Future Farmers of America and 4-H Club. He enjoyed spending time with his parents, Walter E. and Evelyn McGarvey.(4) PFC McGarvey entered the service of the United States Army under the 25th Division, 3rd Brigade, 35th 123456789101112131415161718 Infantry.(5) PFC McGarvey earned many decorations, including the Combat Infantryman Badge, Bronze Star with Valor, Purple Heart, National Defense Service Medal and the Vietnam Cross of Gallantry with Palm Unit Citation.(6) On July 3, 1966, PFC McGarvey was killed in action by machine gun fire while serving on a search and destroy mission located in the Pleiku Province, Vietnam. He made the ultimate sacrifice after single-handedly charging a fortified machine gun position to defend his comrades against enemy fire.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 11527, carrying Pennsylvania Route 729 over Gazzam Run in Jordan Township, Clearfield County, is designated as the PFC Raymond Lee McGarvey Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1847PN2283 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920